Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2392.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5502(a.5) introductory paragraph, (c) and (c.1)(1)(ii) and (iii), (2)(ii), (iii) and (iv), (3) introductory paragraph, (ii) and (iii) and (5)(ii) introductory paragraph and (iii) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 5502(A.5) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, (C), (C.1)(1)(II) AND (III), (2)(II), (III) AND (IV), (3) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, (II) AND (III) AND (5)(II) INTRODUCTORY <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 PARAGRAPH AND (III), (D) AND (N) OF TITLE 30 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 5502. Operating watercraft under influence of alcohol or controlled substance.* * *(a.5) Boating under the influence of alcohol or controlled substance following diversion.--(1) An individual may not operate or be in actual physical control of the movement of a watercraft in violation of subsection (a), (a.1), (a.2), (a.3) or (a.4) within 10 years after completing an Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition program or a pretrial diversion program substantially similar to Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition in another jurisdiction for an offense under this section or a substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction.(2) Any of the following shall constitute sufficient proof that the defendant has, within the last 10 years, completed an Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition program or a pretrial diversion program substantially similar to Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition in another jurisdiction for an offense under this section or a substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction:(i) a certified record of the commission;(ii) a record maintained by the clerk of courts; or(iii) a substantially similar record from another jurisdiction.(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence 20260HB2392PN3546 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bearing upon the question of whether the defendant has, within the last 10 years, completed an Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition program or a pretrial diversion program substantially similar to Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition in another jurisdiction for an offense under this section or a substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction.[(a.5)] (a.6) Exception to two-hour rule.--Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), (a.1), (a.2) [or], (a.4) or (a.5) where alcohol or controlled substance concentration in an individual's blood or breath is an element of the offense, evidence of such alcohol or controlled substance concentration more than two hours after the individual has operated or been in actual physical control of the movement of the watercraft is sufficient to establish that element of the offense under the following circumstances:* * *(c) Grading.--(1) [Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2)] Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3):(i) An individual who violates subsection (a) and who has no more than one prior offense commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment for not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).(ii) An individual who violates subsection (a) and who has [more than one prior offense] two prior offenses or has one prior offense under subsection (a.5) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(iii) An individual who violates this section and 20260HB2392PN3546 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has three or more prior offenses or has previously been convicted of a violation of section 5502.1 (relating to homicide by watercraft while operating under influence) commits a felony of the third degree.(iv) An individual who violates subsection (a), (a.1) or (a.4) and has two prior offenses, one of which includes a violation of subsection (a.5), commits a felony of the third degree.(2) (i) An individual who violates subsection (a)(1) where there was an accident resulting in bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death of any individual or in damage to a watercraft or other property and who has no more than one prior offense commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment for not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).(ii) An individual who violates subsection (a.1) or (a.4) and who has no more than one prior offense commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment for not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).(iii) An individual who violates subsection (a)(1) where the individual refused testing of [blood or] breath under section 5125 (relating to chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance) or chemical testing of blood pursuant to a valid search warrant and who has no prior offenses commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment for not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).20260HB2392PN3546 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) An individual who violates subsection (a.2) or (a.3) and who has no prior offenses commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment for not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).(v) An individual who violates subsection (a)(1) where there was an accident resulting in bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death of any individual or in damage to a watercraft or other property and who has [more than one prior offense] two prior offenses or has one prior offense under subsection (a.5) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(vi) An individual who violates subsection (a.1) or (a.4) and who has [more than one prior offense] two prior offenses commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(vii) An individual who violates subsection (a)(1) where the individual refused testing of [blood or] breath [and who has one or more prior offenses commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.] under section 5125 or chemical testing of blood pursuant to a valid search warrant or who violates subsection (a.2) or (a.3) commits:(A) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the individual has one prior offense.(B) A felony of the third degree if the individual has two prior offenses.(C) A felony of the third degree if the individual has one prior offense under subsection (a.5).(D) A felony of the second degree if the 20260HB2392PN3546 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual has three or more prior offenses.(E) A felony of the second degree if the individual has two prior offenses, one of which includes a violation of subsection (a.5).[(viii) An individual who violates subsection (a.2) or (a.3) and who has one or more prior offenses commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.](ix) An individual who violates this section when a minor under 18 years of age was a passenger in the watercraft when the violation occurred commits [a misdemeanor of the first degree.]:(A) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the individual has no more than one prior offense.(B) A felony of the third degree if the individual has two or more prior offenses or has one prior offense under subsection (a.5).(3) (i) An individual who violates subsection (a.5) where the underlying offense is a violation of subsection (a), (a.1) or (a.4), commits a misdemeanor for which the individual may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than six months and to pay a fine under subsection (c.1).(ii) An individual who violates subsection (a.5) where the underlying offense is a violation of subsection (a.2) or (a.3) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(c.1) Penalties.--(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), (3), (4) or (5), an individual who violates subsection (a) shall be sentenced as follows:* * *20260HB2392PN3546 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) For a second offense or a first offense for a violation of subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than five days and to pay a fine of not less than $300 nor more than $2,500 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(iii) For a third or subsequent offense or a second or subsequent offense following a conviction for violating subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than ten days and to pay a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (3) or (4), an individual who violates subsection (a)(1) where there was an accident resulting in bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death of any individual or damage to a watercraft or other property or who violates subsection (a.1) or (a.4) shall be sentenced as follows:* * *(ii) For a second offense or a first offense for a violation of subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than 30 days and to pay a fine of not less than $750 nor more than $5,000 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(iii) For a third offense or a second or subsequent offense following a conviction for violating subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment 20260HB2392PN3546 - 7 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for not less than 90 days and to pay a fine of not less than $1,500 nor more than $10,000 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(iv) For a fourth or subsequent offense or a third or subsequent offense following a conviction for violating subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than one year and to pay a fine of not less than $1,500 nor more than $10,000 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(3) Except as set forth in paragraph (4), an individual who violates subsection (a)(1) and refused testing of [blood or] breath under section 5125 or chemical testing of blood pursuant to a valid search warrant or an individual who violates subsection (a.2) or (a.3) shall be sentenced as follows:* * *(ii) For a second offense or a first offense for a violation of subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than 90 days and to pay a fine of not less than $1,500 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.(iii) For a third or subsequent offense or a second or subsequent offense following a conviction for violating subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, to undergo imprisonment for not less than one year and to pay a fine of not less than $2,500 and successfully complete an approved boating safety course.20260HB2392PN3546 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(5) An individual who violates this section when a minor under 18 years of age was a passenger in the watercraft when the violation occurred, in addition to any penalty imposed under this section, shall be sentenced as follows:* * *(ii) For a second offense or a first offense for a violation of subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION:* * *(iii) For a third or subsequent offense or a second or subsequent offense following a conviction for violating subsection (a.5) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, undergo imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than two years.* * *(D) [SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION.--ACCEPTANCE OF ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION, AN ADJUDICATION OF DELINQUENCY OR A CONSENT DECREE UNDER 42 PA.C.S. CH. 63 OR ANY OTHER FORM OF PRELIMINARY DISPOSITION OF ANY CHARGE BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION OR A CONVICTION OR GUILTY PLEA UNDER 75 PA.C.S. § 3802 SHALL BE CONSIDERED A FIRST CONVICTION FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPUTING WHETHER A SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSIDERED A SECOND, THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION.] PRIOR OFFENSES.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO PRIOR OFFENSES:(1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (C.1), THE PRIOR OFFENSE MUST HAVE OCCURRED IN ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) WITHIN 10 YEARS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE DEFENDANT IS BEING SENTENCED.20260HB2392PN3546 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) ON OR AFTER THE DATE OF THE OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE DEFENDANT IS BEING SENTENCED.(2) THE COURT SHALL CALCULATE THE NUMBER OF PRIOR OFFENSES, IF ANY, AT THE TIME OF SENTENCING.(3) IF THE DEFENDANT IS SENTENCED FOR TWO OR MORE OFFENSES IN THE SAME DAY, THE OFFENSES SHALL BE CONSIDERED PRIOR OFFENSES WITHIN THE MEANING OF THIS SUBSECTION.(4) IF THE COMPLETION DATE OF THE ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION PROGRAM OR A PRETRIAL DIVERSION PROGRAM SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION FOR AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION OR A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR OFFENSE IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION IS MORE THAN 10 YEARS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE DEFENDANT IS BEING SENTENCED, A PRIOR CONVICTION FOR A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A.5) SHALL BE TREATED AS A PRIOR OFFENSE FOR THE VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A), (A.1), (A.2), (A.3) OR (A.4).* * *(H.1) ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION.--(1) BEFORE A DEFENDANT MAY ACCEPT ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION FOR A CHARGE BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL CONDUCT AN INQUIRY ON THE RECORD TO ENSURE THAT THE DEFENDANT'S ACCEPTANCE INTO ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION AND WAIVER OF APPLICABLE CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS IS MADE KNOWINGLY, VOLUNTARILY AND INTELLIGENTLY.(2) IF A DEFENDANT FAILS TO COMPLETE AN ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION OR OTHER FORM OF PRELIMINARY DISPOSITION AND IS BROUGHT TO TRIAL FOR THE CHARGED OFFENSE, ANY WAIVER OR ACKNOWLEDGMENT OFFERED OR REQUIRED UNDER THIS 20260HB2392PN3546 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT AND SHALL NOT BE USED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT. NO STATEMENT PRESENTED BY THE DEFENDANT SHALL BE USED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR ANY PURPOSE IN A CRIMINAL PROCEEDING EXCEPT A PROSECUTION BASED ON THE FALSITY OF THE INFORMATION OR STATEMENT SUPPLIED.(H.2) RECORD RETENTION.--(1) UPON A DEFENDANT'S SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM PROVIDED FOR IN THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER EVIDENCING THE COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM.(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY ORDER OF EXPUNGEMENT, THE CLERK OF COURTS SHALL RETAIN A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE COURT ORDER EVIDENCING A DEFENDANT HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED THE PROGRAM PROVIDED FOR IN THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH 18 PA.C.S. § 9122(C) (RELATING TO EXPUNGEMENT). THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) THE ORDER SHALL BE MAINTAINED FOR 12 YEARS FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE ENTRY OF THE ORDER.(II) THE ORDER SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO PUBLIC INSPECTION OR DUPLICATION AND SHALL BE USED SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUTURE PROSECUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A.5).(III) A CLERK OF COURTS SHALL PROVIDE A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE ORDER TO ANY PROSECUTING ATTORNEY, COURT OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY UPON REQUEST.(3) IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE EXPIRATION OF 12 YEARS FOLLOWING THE ENTRY OF THE ORDER EVIDENCING COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM, THE CLERK OF COURTS SHALL EXPUNGE THE RECORD OF THE COMPLETION OF ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION. THE CLERK OF COURTS SHALL NOT REQUIRE AN ORDER OF COURT TO EXPUNGE THE RECORD.* * *20260HB2392PN3546 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (N) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"ADULT." AN INDIVIDUAL 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER."MINOR." AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER 21 YEARS OF AGE."PRIOR OFFENSE." EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D), A CONVICTION THAT HAS BEEN IMPOSED, ADJUDICATED OR OTHERWISE PRELIMINARILY DISPOSED BEFORE SENTENCING FOR A VIOLATION OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A), (A.1), (A.2), (A.3), (A.4) OR (A.5).(2) AN OFFENSE UNDER 75 PA.C.S. § 3802.(3) AN OFFENSE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO AN OFFENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION.(4) A COMBINATION OF THE OFFENSES SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1), (2) OR (3).SECTION 2. SECTION 9763 OF TITLE 42 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 9763. CONDITIONS OF PROBATION.* * *(E) RESTRICTIVE PROBATION CONDITIONS.--A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER 30 PA.C.S. § 5502(C.1) (RELATING TO OPERATING WATERCRAFT UNDER INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE) FOR A FIRST, SECOND OR THIRD OFFENSE SHALL HAVE RESTRICTIVE PROBATION CONDITIONS, INCLUDING:(1) HOUSE ARREST WITH ELECTRONIC SURVEILLANCE.(2) PARTIAL CONFINEMENT PROGRAMS, INCLUDING WORK RELEASE, WORK CAMPS OR HALFWAY FACILITIES.(3) A COMBINATION OF PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2).SECTION 3. SECTIONS 3803(C)(2) AND 3804(A)(2) INTRODUCTORY 20260HB2392PN3546 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARAGRAPH, (B)(2) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (C)(2) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH OF TITLE 75, AMENDED DECEMBER 22, 2025 (P.L.363, NO.58), ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 3803. GRADING.* * *(C) OFFENSES FOLLOWING DIVERSION.--* * *(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(H)(1) WHERE THE UNDERLYING OFFENSE IS A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3802(A)(1), WHERE THE INDIVIDUAL REFUSED TESTING OF BREATH OR CHEMICAL TESTING UNDER A VALID SEARCH WARRANT, COURT ORDER OR OTHER BASIS PERMISSIBLE BY THE CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES AND THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA, OR SECTION 3802(C) OR (D), COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE.§ 3804. PENALTIES.(A) GENERAL IMPAIRMENT.--EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (B) OR (C), AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(A) (RELATING TO DRIVING UNDER INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE) SHALL BE SENTENCED AS FOLLOWS:* * *(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE OR A FIRST OFFENSE FOR A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3802(H)(1) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, TO:* * *(B) HIGH RATE OF BLOOD ALCOHOL; MINORS; COMMERCIAL VEHICLES AND SCHOOL BUSES AND SCHOOL VEHICLES; ACCIDENTS.--EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (C), AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(A)(1) WHERE THERE WAS AN ACCIDENT RESULTING IN BODILY INJURY, SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH OF ANY PERSON OR DAMAGE TO A VEHICLE OR OTHER PROPERTY OR WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(B), 20260HB2392PN3546 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) OR (F) SHALL BE SENTENCED AS FOLLOWS:* * *(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE OR A FIRST OFFENSE FOR A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3802(H)(1) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, TO:* * *(C) INCAPACITY; HIGHEST BLOOD ALCOHOL; CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES.--AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(A)(1) AND REFUSED TESTING OF BREATH UNDER SECTION 1547 (RELATING TO CHEMICAL TESTING TO DETERMINE AMOUNT OF ALCOHOL OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE) OR TESTING OF BLOOD PURSUANT TO A VALID SEARCH WARRANT OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SECTION 3802(C) OR (D) SHALL BE SENTENCED AS FOLLOWS:* * *(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE OR A FIRST OFFENSE FOR A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3802(H)(1) WITH AN UNDERLYING VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE ENUMERATED IN THIS SUBSECTION, TO:* * *Section 2 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2392PN3546 - 14 - <--12345678910111213141516171819